Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding ORS 173.240:
(1) The Legislative Counsel and  the Legislative Fiscal Officer shall conduct a review of
state law governing the investment by the State Treasurer of  the funds of this state and of
local and tribal governments. The purpose of the review is to:
(a) Identify deficiencies in current law; and
(b) Make recommendations to clarify, simplify, consolidate and update  the existing stat-
utory framework.
(2) For purposes of the review, the Legislative Counsel and the Legislative  Fiscal Officer
may consult with the Department of Justice and the State Treasurer  and any other officer
or employee of this state or of any local or tribal government.
(3) The Legislative Counsel and the Legislative Fiscal Officer shall submit a report in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, and  may include recommendations for legislation, to the
Joint Committee on Ways and Means, or the Joint Interim  Committee on Ways and Means,
no later than December 31, 2017.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 2, 2018.
SECTION 3. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 221.770, 471.805 and 471.810, for  the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2017, the Oregon Liquor Control Commission  may expend moneys from the
Oregon Liquor Control Commission  Account to pay any expenses incurred by the commission
in implementing and carrying out duties under ORS 475B.010 to  475B.395. Any expenditure
made under this subsection is considered a  loan and must be repaid as provided in subsection
(2) of this section.
(2) Not later than June 30, 2019, the commission shall transfer  from the Marijuana Con-
trol and Regulation  Fund to the Oregon Liquor Control Commission Account an amount
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 1
equal to the total amount expended under subsection (1) of this  section, plus an amount of
simple interest calculated at two percent per annum of the total amount expended.
EDUCATION
SECTION 4.  Section 4, chapter 763, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  [ Section 3 of  this 2015 Act ] ORS 327.376  and the amendments to [ section 1 of this 2015
Act] ORS 327.372 by section 2  [of this 2015 Act ], chapter 763, Oregon Laws 2015,  become operative
on July 1, [ 2017] 2019.
HUMAN SERVICES
SECTION 5.  Section 3, chapter  106, Oregon Laws 2014, as amended by section 1, chapter 776,
Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 3. Section 2, chapter 106, Oregon Laws 2014, is repealed on June 30, [ 2018] 2020.
SECTION 6.  Section 7, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2011, as amended  by section 24, chapter 722,
Oregon Laws 2013, and section 23, chapter 765, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) The amendments to ORS 412.009, 412.014 and 412.024 by sections 2, 3  and 5, chapter
604, Oregon Laws 2011, become operative on October 1, 2011.
(2) The amendments to ORS 412.014 by section 4, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2011,  become op-
erative on July 1, [ 2017] 2019.
SECTION 7.  Section 8, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2011, as amended  by section 25, chapter 722,
Oregon Laws 2013, and section 24, chapter 765, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  Section  1, chapter 604, Oregon Laws 2011, as amended by section 82, chapter 107,
Oregon Laws 2012, section 23, chapter 722, Oregon Laws 2013, and section  22, chapter 765,
Oregon Laws 2015,  is repealed on July 1, [ 2017] 2019.
SECTION 8.  Section 29, chapter 765, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 29. (1) [ Section 4 of this 2015 Act ] ORS 412.007  and the  amendments to ORS 411.635,
412.001, 412.009, 412.079 and 412.124 by sections 6, 10, 12,  19 and 26 [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter 765,
Oregon Laws 2015,  become operative on April 1, 2016.
(2) The amendments to ORS 412.124 by section 7 [ of this 2015 Act ], chapter 765,  Oregon Laws
2015, become operative on July 1, [ 2017] 2019.
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
SECTION 9.  ORS 458.555 is amended to read:
458.555. (1)  There is established the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and
Service within the [ Housing and Community Services Department ] Office of the Governor .
(2) The  commission shall consist of at least 15 members appointed by the Governor and may
consist of not more than 25 members appointed by the Governor.
(3) The term of office of each member is three years, but a member serves at  the pleasure of the
Governor. Before the expiration of the term of a member, the Governor shall appoint a  successor
whose term begins on the first day of the next following month. A member is  eligible for reap-
pointment. If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make an appointment to become
immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) The appointment of the members of the commission is subject to confirmation by  the Senate
in the manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(5) A member of the commission is entitled to receive, from moneys available  to the commission,
actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in  the performance of official duties as
provided in ORS 292.495.
SECTION 10.  ORS 458.558 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 2
458.558. (1) The members of  the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Ser-
vice must be citizens of  this state who have a proven commitment to community service and who
have a demonstrated interest in fostering and nurturing citizen involvement as a strategy for
strengthening communities and promoting the ethic of service in all sectors of this state.
(2) The  Governor shall appoint as members of the commission at least one of each of the fol-
lowing:
(a) An individual with experience in educational, training and development needs of youth, par-
ticularly disadvantaged youth.
(b) An individual with experience in promoting involvement  of older adults in service and
volunteerism.
(c) A representative of community-based agencies or organizations within this state.
(d) The Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction or designee.
(e) A representative of local governments in this state.
(f) A representative of local labor unions in this state.
(g) A representative of business.
(h) A person at least 16, but not more  than 25, years of age who is a participant or supervisor
in a national service program.
(i) A representative of a national service program described in 42 U.S.C. 12572(a).
(3) In addition to  appointing members under subsection (2) of this section, the Governor may
appoint as members individuals from the following groups:
(a) Educators.
(b) Experts in the delivery of  human, educational, environmental or public safety services to
communities and individuals.
(c) Members of Native American tribes.
(d) At-risk youths who are out of school.
(e) Entities that receive assistance under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973 (42 U.S.C.
4950 et seq.).
[(f) A director or representative of a CASA Volunteer Program. ]
[(g) A court appointed special advocate. ]
(4) In making  appointments of members described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
Governor shall ensure that:
(a) No more than 50 percent of the appointed members are from the same political party; and
(b) No more than 25 percent of the appointed members are state employees.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 458.563 is amended to read:
458.563. (1) The  Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service shall appoint
a director to serve  at the pleasure of the [ commission] Governor. The director must have experience
and education in public administration or nonprofit management.
(2) The designation of the director must be by written order, filed with the Secretary of State.
(3) Subject to any applicable  provisions of the State Personnel Relations Law, the director shall
appoint all subordinate officers and employees of  the commission, prescribe their duties and fix their
compensation.
(4) The director of the commission  shall report to, and comply with the directions of, the [ Di-
rector of the Housing and Community Services Department ] Office of the Governor  in  the develop-
ment and administration of nonpolicymaking activities, including but not limited  to rules and other
directions for commission personnel, fiscal practices and purchasing of commission supplies.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 458.578 is amended to read:
458.578. (1) The Legislative Assembly declares that the purpose of this section is to promote the
development of better communities by using citizen participation and  volunteerism to foster greater
civic  responsibility.
(2) The Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and  Service shall identify goals to
develop and facilitate the initiation of public and  private entity programs that will encourage and
reward citizen participation and volunteerism. [ The Housing and Community  Services Department
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 3
may adopt rules and develop procedures appropriate to foster the  initiation of programs that fulfill the
citizen participation and  volunteerism goals recommended by the commission. ] The programs developed
and facilitated by the commission goals [ and department rules and procedures ] must have one or
more of the following objectives:
(a) To place increased  priority on citizen participation and volunteerism as a means for ad-
dressing complex problems facing Oregon communities.
(b) To encourage community leaders to implement  strategies that recognize community volun-
teers as a valuable and much-needed asset for expanding civic responsibility.
(c) To promote the concept  and practice of business and corporate volunteering, with emphasis
on communities where business and corporate volunteering initiatives are less developed.
(d) To increase the enthusiasm, dedication and combined expertise of citizens and public and
private entities for creating new ways  to effectively use citizen participation and volunteerism in
meeting the current and future challenges facing Oregon communities.
(e) To increase  the alignment between community volunteer resources and the goals of the state.
(f) To implement policy and administrative changes that encourage and enable  citizen partic-
ipation and volunteerism by individuals.
(g) To encourage nonprofit agencies to increase effectiveness  and efficiency by including the use
of volunteers in their service delivery systems.
(h) To promote and support the concept of participation and volunteerism by  all citizens as an
effective means to address community  needs and achieve a collective commitment to lifelong com-
munity service.
(i) To recognize National Volunteer Week as a time for encouraging citizens  to participate in
community service projects.
(j) To recognize the importance  of individual volunteers and of volunteer and service organiza-
tions and to honor and celebrate the success of volunteers.
SECTION 13.  ORS 458.580 is amended to read:
458.580. As used in ORS 419B.112, [ 458.558,] 458.581 and 458.582:
(1) “CASA Volunteer Program”  means a program that is approved or sanctioned by a juvenile
court, has received accreditation  from the National CASA Association and has entered into a con-
tract with the Oregon Volunteers Commission for Voluntary Action and Service  under ORS 458.581
to recruit, train and supervise volunteers to serve as court appointed special advocates.
(2) “Court appointed special advocate” means a person in a CASA Volunteer Program who is
appointed by the court to act as a court appointed special advocate pursuant to ORS 419B.112.
TRANSPORTATION
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding ORS 367.080 to 367.086, for the biennium beginning July  1,
2017, the Department of Transportation shall first transfer the amount of $3  million, out of
the moneys received from the repayment of loans from  the Connect Oregon Fund, to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit  into the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Fund established under ORS 285B.092,  for the purpose of providing a grant to the
Oregon Manufacturing Innovation Center to advance manufacturing technologies through
applied research and development relating to marine, freight and aviation transportation.
LEGISLATIVE BRANCH
SECTION 15.
 Section 4, chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended  by section 5, chapter 840,
Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  The amendments to ORS 171.072, 292.912 and 292.930 by sections  1 to 3, chapter 578,
Oregon Laws 2013, apply  to salaries established for biennia beginning on or after July 1, [2017]
2019.
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 4
SECTION 16. If this 2017 Act does not become effective until after June 30, 2017, the
amendments to section 4, chapter 578, Oregon  Laws 2013, by section 15 of this 2017 Act shall
be operative retroactively to that date, and the operation  and effect of section 4, chapter 578,
Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 5,  chapter 840, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 15
of this 2017 Act,  shall continue unaffected from June 30, 2017, to the effective date of this
2017 Act.  Any otherwise lawful action taken or otherwise lawful obligation incurred under
the authority of section 4,  chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 5, chapter
840, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 15 of this 2017 Act, after June 30,  2017, and before the
effective date of this 2017 Act, is ratified and approved.
SECTION 17.  If Senate Bill 1022 becomes law,  section 4, chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2013, as
amended by section 5, chapter 840, Oregon Laws 2015,  and section 15 of this 2017 Act, is amended
to read:
Sec. 4.  The amendments to ORS 171.072[ , 292.912 and 292.930 by sections 1 to 3 ] by section  1,
chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2013, apply to salaries established for biennia beginning on or after  July
1, 2019.
SECTION 18. The amendments to section 4, chapter  578, Oregon Laws 2013, by section
17 of this 2017 Act become operative on January 1, 2018.
JUDICIAL BRANCH
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other law, the  governing body of a county may, after
consulting with the presiding judge of the circuit court, use up to one-half of the moneys
distributed to the county by the Chief Justice of  the Supreme Court from moneys appropri-
ated to the Judicial Department for the purpose  of operating law libraries or providing law
library services, for the purpose of providing  conciliation and mediation services in circuit
courts.
SECTION 19a.
 If House Bill 2795 becomes law, section  28, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017
(Enrolled House Bill 2795) , is amended to read:
Sec. 28.  The amendments to ORS  21.006 by section 27 , chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (En-
rolled House Bill 2795),  [ of this 2017 Act ] apply  to fees collected on or after [ October] July 1, 2017.
NATURAL  RESOURCES
SECTION 20. An expenditure of moneys from the Water Supply Development Account  is
not subject to  any application process or public benefit scoring or ranking under ORS 541.663,
541.666, 541.669, 541.673 or 541.677 if the expenditure is for a purpose:
(1) Specifically identified in an appropriation to the account from the General Fund for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, for carrying out the purpose; or
(2) Specifically identified in legislation enacted by the  Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly
that authorizes a transfer  of lottery bond proceeds to the account for carrying out the pur-
pose.
SECTION 21. Section 20 of this 2017 Act is repealed July 1, 2021.
SECTION 22. ORS 469.960, 469.961,  469.962, 469.963, 469.964, 469.965 and 469.966 are re-
pealed.
SECTION 22a. If Senate Bill 908 becomes law, sections 49 (amending ORS  469.963) and 50
(amending ORS 469.966), chapter  ___, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled Senate Bill 908), are re-
pealed.
TRANSFERS FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENTAL PURPOSES
SECTION 23. (1) The  Alternative Fuel Vehicle Revolving Fund established under ORS
469.961 is abolished on the effective date of this 2017 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 5
(2) Any moneys remaining in the fund specified in subsection (1) of this section on the
effective date of this 2017 Act shall be transferred, on the effective  date of this 2017 Act, to
the General Fund for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 24. Notwithstanding ORS 30.282, 30.285, 278.425, 655.515 and 655.540, the amount
of $33,300,000 is transferred from  the Insurance Fund to the General Fund for general gov-
ernmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2019.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding ORS 283.076, the amount of $18,500,000 is transferred from
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services Operating Fund to  the General Fund for
general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2019.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding ORS 291.041, the amount of $10,500,000 is transferred from
the State Information Technology Operating Fund to  the General Fund for general govern-
mental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2019.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding ORS 180.095, the amount of $46,000,000 is transferred from
the Department of  Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account to the General Fund
for general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2019.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding ORS 357.200, the amount of $40,000  is transferred from the
Miscellaneous Receipts Account to  the General Fund for general governmental purposes. The
transfer shall be made on the effective date of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 29. The transfers described in sections 23, 24, 25, 26, 27 and 28 of  this 2017 Act
shall be made from moneys maintained, on the effective date of  this 2017 Act, in the funds
or accounts from which the transfers are made.
MARIJUANA REVENUE DISTRIBUTION
SECTION 30. Section 31 of this 2017 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475B.700 to
475B.760.
SECTION 31. (1) Not later than 30 days before the beginning  of each calendar quarter,
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall forecast and prepare an estimate
of the revenue that will be received  during the remainder of the current biennium and sub-
sequent three biennia  pursuant to the tax imposed under ORS 475B.705. The estimate may
be made on the basis of all pertinent information available to the  Oregon Department of
Administrative Services. Upon making the estimate,  the Oregon Department of Administra-
tive Services  shall report the estimate to the Legislative Revenue Officer, the Legislative
Fiscal Officer and the Department of Revenue.
(2) The Department  of Revenue and the Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall provide
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services with any information necessary for the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services to perform its duties under this section.
SECTION 32.
 Section 44, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended  by section 14, chapter 699,
Oregon Laws 2015, and section 219, chapter 767, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 44.  [ (1) There is established  the Oregon Marijuana Account, separate and distinct from the
General Fund.]
[(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account  under section 11 of this 2015
Act.]
[(3) Subject to subsection (4) of this section, the Department of Revenue shall  certify the amount
of moneys available for distribution  in the Oregon Marijuana Account and distribute the moneys as
follows: ]
[(a) Forty percent must be transferred to the Common School Fund; ]
[(b) Twenty percent must be transferred to the  Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Ac-
count established under ORS 430.380; ]
[(c) Fifteen  percent must be transferred to the State Police Account established under ORS
181.175;]
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 6
[(d) To assist local law enforcement in  performing its duties under sections 3 to 70, chapter 1,
Oregon Laws 2015, 10 percent must be transferred to the cities of this state in the following shares: ]
[(A) For  all distributions made from the Oregon Marijuana Account before July 1, 2017, in such
shares as the population of each city bears to the population of the cities  of this state, as determined
by Portland State University last preceding such apportionment, under ORS 190.510 to 190.610; and ]
[(B) For all distributions made from the Oregon Marijuana Account on or after July 1, 2017: ]
[(i) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in such shares as the number of licenses
issued by the commission under sections 19 to 21, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015,  during the calendar
year preceding the date of the distribution for premises  located in each city bears to the number of such
licenses issued by the commission during such calendar year for all premises in this state; and ]
[(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in  such shares as the number of licenses
issued by the  commission under section 22, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015, during the calendar year
preceding the date of the distribution  for premises located in each city bears to the number of such li-
censes issued by the commission during such calendar year for all premises in this state; ]
[(e) To assist  local law enforcement in performing its duties under sections 3 to 70, chapter 1,
Oregon Laws 2015, 10 percent must be transferred to counties in the following shares: ]
[(A) For  all distributions made from the Oregon Marijuana Account before July 1, 2017, in such
shares as their respective populations bear to the total population of this state, as  estimated from time
to time by Portland State University; and ]
[(B) For all distributions made from the Oregon Marijuana Account on or after July 1, 2017: ]
[(i) Fifty percent of  the 10 percent must be transferred in such shares as the number of licenses
issued by the commission under sections 19 to 21, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015,  during the calendar
year preceding the date of the distribution for  premises located in each county bears to the number of
such licenses issued by the commission during such calendar year for all premises in this state; and ]
[(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must  be transferred in such shares as the number of licenses
issued by the commission under section 22, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015, during the  calendar year
preceding the date of the distribution for premises located in each county bears to  the number of such
licenses issued by the commission during such calendar year for all premises in this state; and ]
[(f) Five percent must be transferred to the Oregon Health Authority to be used for the establish-
ment, operation and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention  and treat-
ment services. ]
[(4) A city  or county that adopts ordinances prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which
a license is issued under section 19, 20, 21 or 22, chapter 1, Oregon  Laws 2015, or prohibiting the es-
tablishment of an entity for which registration is required  under ORS 475.300 to 475.346, is not eligible
to receive distributions under this section. ]
[(5) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly that the moneys distributed from the Oregon
Marijuana Account to the persons listed in subsection (3) of this section are in addition  to, and not in
lieu of, any other moneys available to such persons. ]
(1) There is established the Oregon Marijuana Account,  separate and distinct from the
General Fund.
(2) The account shall consist of moneys transferred to the account under ORS 475B.760.
(3)(a) The Department of Revenue shall certify quarterly the amount of moneys available
in the Oregon Marijuana Account.
(b) Subject  to subsection (4) of this section, the department shall transfer quarterly 20
percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account as follows:
(A) Ten percent of the moneys  in the account must be transferred to the cities of this
state in the following shares:
(i) Seventy-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares  that reflect the
population of each city of this state that is not exempt from this paragraph  pursuant to
subsection (4)(a) of this section compared to the population of all cities of this state that are
not exempt from this  paragraph pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section, as determined
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 7
by Portland State University under  ORS 190.510 to 190.610, on the date immediately preceding
the date of the transfer; and
(ii) Twenty-five percent of the 10 percent must be transferred  in shares that reflect the
number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.110 on the last
business day of the calendar quarter preceding the date of the transfer for premises  located
in each city compared  to the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.070, 475B.090,
475B.100 and  475B.110 on the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in
this state located in cities; and
(B) Ten percent of the moneys in the  account must be transferred to counties in the
following shares:
(i) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares  that reflect the total
commercially available area of all grow canopies associated with  marijuana producer licenses
held pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the  last business day of the calendar quarter preceding the
date of the  transfer for all premises located in each county compared to the total commer-
cially available area of all grow canopies associated with marijuana producer licenses held
pursuant to ORS 475B.070 on the last business day of that calendar  quarter for all premises
located in this state; and
(ii) Fifty percent of the 10 percent must be transferred in shares that reflect the  number
of licenses held pursuant  to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 and 475B.110 on the last business day of
the calendar quarter preceding the date of the  transfer for premises located in each county
compared to the number of licenses held pursuant to ORS 475B.090, 475B.100  and 475B.110
on the last business day of that calendar quarter for all premises in this state.
(c) Eighty percent of the moneys in the Oregon Marijuana Account must be used  as fol-
lows:
(A) Forty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely  for purposes for
which moneys in the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008 may be used;
(B) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes for
which moneys in the Mental Health Alcoholism  and Drug Services Account established under
ORS 430.380 may be used;
(C) Fifteen percent of the moneys in  the account must be used solely for purposes for
which moneys in the State Police Account established under  ORS 181A.020 may be used; and
(D) Five percent of the moneys in the account must be used solely for purposes related
to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4)(a) A city that has  an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for which
issuance of a license under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.110  is required is not
eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(A) of this section.
(b) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of  a premises for which
issuance of a license under ORS  475B.070 is required is not eligible to receive transfers of
moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(i) of this section.
(c) A county that has an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a  premises for which
issuance of a license under ORS 475B.090, 475B.100 or  475B.110 is required is not eligible to
receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B)(ii) of this section.
(5) In a form  and manner prescribed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, each city
and county in this state shall certify with the commission whether  the city or county has
an ordinance prohibiting the establishment of a premises for  which issuance of a license
under ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100 or 475B.110 is required. If a city fails to comply  with
this subsection, the city  is not eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection
(3)(b)(A) of this section. If a  county fails to comply with this subsection, the county is not
eligible to receive transfers of moneys under subsection (3)(b)(B) of this section.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 327.008 is amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 8
(b) The Department of Education, on  behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private  sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State  School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred  from the Education Stability Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account  and
moneys received as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to  327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101, 327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961 and sections 1 to 3, chapter 735, Oregon Laws
2013.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  school district a State School
Fund grant, consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility  grant
and a transportation grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue,  computed as
provided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year  after a public charter school ceases to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination or nonrenewal of  a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund to each school district that had sponsored a  public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount  equal to the school district’s general purpose grant per extended
ADMw  multiplied  by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures  used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in  average daily membership used in the distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
(7) A school district  may not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount of the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants  may not ex-
ceed $9 million in any biennium.  If the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the Department of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available  for facility
grants among those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does  not exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend from the  State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125  (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of  Education shall transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility  Account  established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount  of $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $33 million from the  State
School Fund to the Network of Quality Teaching and Learning Fund established  under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The  total amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $5 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school  districts from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $14 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education  service districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $14 million.
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 9
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified  in paragraph (b)(B) and (C) of this subsection shall
be adjusted by the same  percentage by which the amount appropriated to the State School Fund for
that biennium is increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as determined  by
the Department of Education after consultation with the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
(13) Each biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the  State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language  Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from  the State
School Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section  and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend  up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide administration of and support for the development of  talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education may expend  up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of  a program to increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
(17) Each fiscal year,  the Department of Education shall transfer the amount of $2.5 million from
the State School Fund to  the Small School District Supplement Fund established in section 3,
chapter 735, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 34.
 ORS  327.008, as amended by section 7, chapter 735, Oregon Laws 2013, section
7, chapter 81, Oregon  Laws 2014, section 2, chapter 68, Oregon Laws 2015, section 38, chapter 245,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 2, chapter 555, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 11, chapter 604, Oregon Laws
2015, section 2, chapter  644, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 8, chapter 783, Oregon Laws 2015, is
amended to read:
327.008. (1)(a) There is established a State School Fund in the General Fund.
(b) The Department of Education, on  behalf of the State of Oregon, may solicit and accept gifts,
grants, donations and other moneys from public and private  sources for the State School Fund.
Moneys received as provided in this paragraph shall be deposited into the State School Fund.
(c) The State School Fund shall consist of moneys appropriated by the  Legislative Assembly,
moneys transferred from the Education Stability Fund and the Oregon Marijuana Account  and
moneys received as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(d) The State School Fund is continuously appropriated to the Department of Education for the
purposes of ORS 327.006 to 327.077, 327.095, 327.099, 327.101,  327.125, 327.137, 327.348, 336.575,
336.580, 336.635, 343.243, 343.533, 343.941 and 343.961.
(2) There shall be apportioned from the State School Fund to each  school district a State School
Fund grant,  consisting of the positive amount equal to a general purpose grant and a facility grant
and a transportation  grant and a high cost disabilities grant minus local revenue, computed as
provided in ORS 327.011 and 327.013.
(3) For the first school year after a public charter school ceases  to operate because of dissol-
ution or closure or because of termination  or nonrenewal of a charter, there shall be apportioned
from the State School Fund  to each school district that had sponsored a public charter school that
ceased to operate an amount equal to the school district’s general  purpose grant per extended
ADMw multiplied by five percent of the ADM of the public charter school for the previous  school
year.
(4) There shall be apportioned  from the State School Fund to each education service district a
State School Fund grant as calculated under ORS 327.019.
(5) All figures used in the determination of the distribution of the State School Fund  shall be
estimates for the same year as the distribution occurs, unless otherwise specified.
(6) Numbers of students in average daily membership used in the  distribution formula shall be
the numbers as of June of the year of distribution.
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 10
(7) A school district  may not use the portion of the State School Fund grant that is attributable
to the facility grant for capital construction costs.
(8) The total amount  of the State School Fund that is distributed as facility grants may not ex-
ceed $9 million in any biennium.  If the total amount to be distributed as facility grants exceeds this
limitation, the Department  of Education shall prorate the amount of funds available for facility
grants among those school districts that qualified for a facility grant. If the total amount to be dis-
tributed as facility grants does  not exceed this limitation, any remaining amounts shall be expended
for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities as provided in ORS 326.125 (1).
(9) Each biennium, the Department  of Education may expend from the State School Fund no
more than $6 million for expenses incurred by the Office of School Facilities under ORS 326.125  (2)
to (6).
(10) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall  transfer to the Pediatric Nursing Fa-
cility Account established in ORS 327.022 the amount necessary to pay the costs of  educational
services provided to students admitted to pediatric nursing facilities as provided in ORS 343.941.
(11) Each fiscal year, the Department of Education shall transfer the amount  of $35 million from
the State School Fund to the High Cost Disabilities Account established in ORS 327.348.
(12)(a) Each  biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $33 million from the State
School Fund to the Network of Quality Teaching and Learning Fund established  under ORS 342.953.
(b) For the purpose of making the transfer under this subsection:
(A) The  total amount available for all distributions from the State School Fund shall be reduced
by $5 million;
(B) The amount distributed to school  districts from the State School Fund under this section and
ORS 327.013 shall be reduced by $14 million; and
(C) The amount distributed to education  service districts from the State School Fund under this
section and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by $14 million.
(c) For each biennium, the amounts identified  in paragraph (b)(B) and (C) of this subsection shall
be adjusted by the same  percentage by which the amount appropriated to the State School Fund for
that biennium  is increased or decreased compared with the preceding biennium, as determined by
the Department of Education after consultation with the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
(13) Each  biennium, the Department of Education shall transfer $12.5 million from the State
School Fund to the Statewide English Language  Learner Program Account established under ORS
327.344.
(14) Each fiscal  year, the Department of Education may expend up to $550,000 from the State
School Fund for the contract described in ORS 329.488. The amount distributed to education service
districts from the State School Fund under this section  and ORS 327.019 shall be reduced by the
amount expended by the department under this subsection.
(15) Each biennium, the Department of Education  may expend up to $350,000 from the State
School Fund to provide  administration of and support for the development of talented and gifted
education under ORS 343.404.
(16) Each biennium, the Department of Education  may expend up to $150,000 from the State
School Fund for the administration of a program to  increase the number of speech-language
pathologists and speech-language pathology assistants under ORS 348.394 to 348.406.
SECTION 35.
(1) Notwithstanding section 44 (3)(b)(A), chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015,  10
percent of the moneys transferred to the Oregon Marijuana Account  that were collected
before July 1, 2017, must be transferred to  the cities of this state in shares that reflect the
population of each city of this state  compared to the population of all cities of this state on
July 1, 2017, as determined by Portland State University under ORS 190.510 to 190.610.
(2) Notwithstanding section 44 (3)(b)(B), chapter 1, Oregon  Laws 2015, 10 percent of the
moneys transferred to the Oregon Marijuana Account  that were collected before July 1, 2017,
must be transferred to the counties  of this state in shares that reflect the population of each
county of this state compared to the population of all counties  of this state on July 1, 2017,
as determined by Portland State University under ORS 190.510 to 190.610.
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 11
SECTION 36. Section 35 of this 2017 Act is repealed on January 1, 2018.
SECTION 37. The amendments  to section 44, chapter 1, Oregon Laws 2015, by section 32
of this 2017 Act apply to moneys transferred or used by the Department of Revenue on or
after the effective date of this 2017 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 38.
The unit captions used in this 2017 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2017 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 39. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3470 (HB 3470-A) Page 12